Utah statutes.
4-3-8.   Licenses and permits -- Application -- Fee -- Expiration -- Renewal.

(1)  Application for a license to operate a plant, manufacture butter or cheese, pasteurize milk, test milk for payment, haul milk in bulk, or for the wholesale distribution of dairy products shall be made to the department upon forms prescribed and furnished by it.

(2)  Upon receipt of a proper application, compliance with all applicable rules, and payment of a license fee determined by the department according to Subsection 4-2-2(2), the commissioner, if satisfied that the public convenience and necessity and the industry will be served, shall issue an appropriate license to the applicant subject to suspension or revocation for cause.

(3)  Each license issued under this section expires at midnight on December 31 of each year.

(4)  A license to operate a plant, manufacture butter or cheese, pasteurize milk, test milk for payment, haul milk in bulk, or for the wholesale distribution of dairy products, is renewable for a period of one year upon the payment of an annual license renewal fee determined by the department according to Subsection 4-2-2(2) on or before December 31 of each year.

(5)  Application for a permit or certificate to produce milk shall be made to the department on forms prescribed and furnished by it.

(6) (a)  Upon receipt of a proper application and compliance with all applicable rules, the commissioner shall issue a permit entitling the applicant to engage in the business of producer, subject to suspension or revocation for cause.

(b)  No fee may be charged by the department for issuance of a permit or certificate.

